Utah statutes.
49-15-204.   Conversion to system -- Time schedule.

The following laws govern conversion to the Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement System:

(1)  For an employee governed by Subsection 49-15-201(1)(a), the election to participate in this system shall be made within six months of July 1, 1989.

(2) (a) (i)  For an employer governed by Subsection 49-15-201(2)(a), the election to participate in this system shall be made within six months of July 1, 1989.

(ii)  The employer shall indicate whether or not it elects to participate by enacting a resolution or ordinance to that effect.

(iii)  Prior to the enactment of the resolution or ordinance, a hearing shall be held by the employer, at which all public safety service employees of the employer shall be given an opportunity to be heard on the question of participating in this system.

(iv)  Notice of the hearing shall be mailed to all public safety service employees within 30 days of the hearing and shall contain the time, place, and purpose of the hearing.

(b)  A public safety service employee of an employer, prior to its election to participate, has six months from the date the employer elects to participate in which to elect to become eligible for service credit in this system.

(3) (a)  Subsections (1) and (2) shall be used to provide a time period of conversion to the Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement System beginning July 1, 1998, and ending December 31, 1998.

(b)  A person converting to the system during this time period is subject to all the rights, limitations, terms, and conditions of Chapter 15, Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement Act.

(4)  Subsections (1) and (2) shall be used to provide a time period for an appointed chief of police to convert to the Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement System beginning July 1, 2002, and ending December 31, 2002.  A chief of police converting to the system during this time period shall be subject to all the rights, limitations, terms, and conditions of Chapter 15, Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement Act, including an employer's election under Subsection (2).

(5) (a)  Subsections (1) and (2) shall be used to provide a time period of conversion to the Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement System beginning July 1, 2007, and ending December 31, 2007.

(b)  A person converting to the system during this time period is subject to all the rights, limitations, terms, and conditions of Chapter 15, Public Safety Noncontributory Retirement Act.

